Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1514
Respondent member; file response.

The respondent member may file a response to the petition filed pursuant to section 50-1511 with the Clerk of the Legislature within ten calendar days after receipt of service of the petition. If the respondent member files a response, he or she shall also serve a copy of the response on the petitioner within such ten-day period.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 21.
July 19, 2018